Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.370

Consolidation of districts—Concurrent resolution.

Should it appear that two-thirds of the members of each of the boards of districts proposed to be consolidated favor consolidation each of said boards shall then, by a vote of not less than two-thirds of its members adopt a concurrent resolution in favor of consolidation, declaring its willingness to consolidate, specifying a name for the consolidated district. Immediately upon the adoption of said concurrent resolution a copy of same signed by not less than two-thirds of the members of each board shall be forwarded to the county commissioners of the county in which all of or a major portion of the land of all, the districts consolidated are situated.

[ 1957 c 153 s 37.]